Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the snowmobile trails and enforcement account in the natural resources fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to Itasca County for safety improvements on the Pokegama Bridge trail system. new text end